California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
 be considered to equal the aggregate fee schedule amount for the state fiscal year if the difference between the available fee amount for the state fiscal year and the aggregate fee schedule amount for the state fiscal year constitutes less than 1 percent of the aggregate fee schedule amount for the state fiscal year.

(c) (1) Each emergency medical transport provider subject to the fee shall remit to the department an amount equal to the annual quality assurance fee rate for the 2018–19 state fiscal year multiplied by the number of transports reported or that should have been reported by the emergency medical transport provider pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 14129.1 in the quarter beginning on April 1, 2018, based on a schedule established by the director. The schedule established by the director for the fee payment
 described in this paragraph shall require remittance of the fee payment according to the following guidelines:

(A) The director shall require an emergency medical transport provider that rendered 35,000 or more Medi-Cal fee-for-service emergency medical transports during the 2016–17 state fiscal year to remit the fee payment described in this paragraph on or after July 1, 2018.

(B) The director shall require an emergency medical transport
 provider that rendered fewer than 35,000 Medi-Cal fee-for-service emergency medical transports during the 2016–17 state fiscal year to remit 50 percent or less of the fee payment described in this paragraph on or after August 1, 2018.

(C) The director shall require an emergency medical transport provider that rendered fewer than 35,000 Medi-Cal fee-for-service emergency medical transports during the 2016–17 state fiscal year to remit any remaining fee payment amount described in this paragraph on or after August 15, 2018.

(2) Commencing with the state fiscal quarter beginning on October 1, 2018, and continuing each state fiscal quarter thereafter, on or before the first day of each state fiscal quarter, each emergency medical transport provider subject to the fee shall
 remit to the department an amount equal to the annual quality assurance fee rate for the applicable state fiscal year multiplied by the number of transports reported or that should have been reported by the emergency medical transport provider pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 14129.1 in the immediately preceding quarter.

(d) (1) Interest shall be assessed on quality assurance fees not paid on the date due at the greater of 10 percent per annum or the rate at which the department assesses interest on Medi-Cal program overpayments pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 14171. Interest shall begin to accrue the day after the date the payment was due and shall be deposited in the Medi-Cal Emergency Medical Transport Fund established in subdivision (f).

(2) In the event that any fee payment is more than 60 days overdue, the department may deduct the unpaid fee and interest owed from any Medi-Cal reimbursement payments owed to the emergency medical transport provider until the full amount of the fee, interest, and any penalties assessed under this article are recovered. Any deduction made pursuant to this subdivision shall be made only after the department gives the emergency medical transport provider written notification. Any deduction made pursuant to this subdivision may be deducted over a period of time that takes into account the financial condition of the emergency medical transport provider.

(3) In the event that any fee payment is more than 60 days overdue, a penalty equal to the interest charge described in paragraph (1) shall be assessed and due for each month for
 which the payment is not received after 60 days. Any funds resulting from a penalty imposed pursuant to this paragraph shall be deposited into the Medi-Cal Emergency Medical Transport Fund created pursuant to subdivision (f).

(4) The director may waive a portion or all of either the interest or penalties, or both, assessed under this article in the event the director determines, in the director’s sole discretion, that the emergency medical transport provider has demonstrated that imposition of the full amount of the quality assurance fee pursuant to the timelines applicable under this article has a high likelihood of creating an undue financial hardship for the provider. Waiver of some or all of the interest or penalties pursuant to this paragraph shall be conditioned on the emergency medical transport provider’s agreement to make fee
 payments on an alternative schedule developed by the department.

(e) The department shall accept an emergency medical transport provider’s payment even if the payment is submitted in a rate year subsequent to the rate year in which the fee was assessed.

(f) (1) The director shall deposit the quality assurance fees collected pursuant to this section in the Medi-Cal Emergency Medical Transport Fund, which is hereby created in the State Treasury and, notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, is continuously appropriated without regard to fiscal years to the department for the purposes specified in this article. Notwithstanding Section 16305.7 of the Government Code, the fund shall also include interest and dividends earned on moneys in the
 fund.

(2) The moneys in the Medi-Cal Emergency Medical Transport Fund, including any interest and dividends earned on money in the fund, shall be available exclusively to enhance federal financial participation for ambulance services under the Medi-Cal program and to provide additional reimbursement to, and to support quality improvement efforts of, emergency medical transport providers, and to pay for the state’s administrative costs and to provide funding for health care coverage for Californians, in the following order of priority:

(A) To pay for the department’s staffing and administrative costs directly attributable to implementing this article, not to exceed the following amounts:

(i) For the 2018–19 state
 fiscal year, one million three thousand dollars ($1,003,000), exclusive of any federal matching funds.

(ii) For the 2019–20 state fiscal year and each state fiscal year thereafter, three hundred seventy-four thousand dollars ($374,000), exclusive of any federal matching funds.

(B) To pay for the health care coverage in each applicable state fiscal year in the amount of 10 percent of the annual quality assurance fee collection amount, exclusive of any federal matching funds.

(C) To make increased payments to emergency medical transport providers pursuant to this article.

(g) In the event of a merger, acquisition, or similar transaction involving an emergency
 medical transport provider that has outstanding quality assurance fee payment obligations pursuant to this article, including any interest and penalty amounts owed, the resultant or successor emergency medical transport provider shall be responsible for paying to the department the full amount of outstanding quality assurance fee payments, including any applicable interest and penalties, attributable to the emergency medical transport provider for which it was assessed, upon the effective date of the transaction. An entity considering a merger, acquisition, or similar transaction involving an emergency medical transport provider may submit a request pursuant to Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code to ascertain the outstanding quality assurance fee payment obligations of the emergency medical transport provider pursuant to this article as of the date of
 the department’s response to that request.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 615, Sec. 454.   (AB 474)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Operative January 1, 2023, pursuant to Sec. 463 of Stats. 2021, Ch. 615.   Conditionally inoperative as prescribed in Section 14129.7.   Repealed conditionally as provided in Section 14129.7.)
-------------------------------------------

14129.3.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (i) of Section 14105.945, commencing July 1, 2018, and for each state fiscal year thereafter for which this article is operative, reimbursement to emergency medical transport providers for emergency medical transports shall be increased by application of an add-on to the associated Medi-Cal fee-for-service payment schedule. The add-on increase to the fee-for-service payment schedule under this section shall be calculated on or before June 15, 2018, and shall remain the same for later state fiscal years for which this article is operative, to the extent the department determines federal financial participation is available and is not otherwise jeopardized. The add-on increase to the fee-for-service payment
 schedule under this section shall apply only to those billing codes identified in, or any equivalent, predecessor, or successor billing codes as may be determined by the director pursuant to, subdivision (g) of Section 14129. The department shall calculate the projections required by this subdivision based on the data submitted pursuant to Section 14129.1. The fee-for-service add-on shall be equal to the quotient of the available fee amount projected by the department on or before June 15, 2018, for the 2018–19 state fiscal year, divided by the total Medi-Cal emergency medical transports, including both fee-for-service transports paid by the department and managed care transports paid by Medi-Cal managed care health plans, utilizing
 these billing codes projected by the department on or before June 15, 2018, for the 2018–19 state fiscal year. The resulting fee-for-service payment schedule amounts after the application of this section shall be equal to the sum of the Medi-Cal fee-for-service payment schedule amount for the 2015–16 state fiscal year and the add-on increase.

(b) (1) Each applicable Medi-Cal managed care health plan shall satisfy its obligation under Section 438.114(c) of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations for emergency medical transports and shall provide payment to noncontract emergency medical transport providers consistent with Section 1396u-2(b)(2)(D) of Title 42 of the United States Code. Effective July 1, 2018, and for each state fiscal year thereafter for which this article is operative, the amounts a noncontract
 emergency medical transport provider could collect if the beneficiary received medical assistance other than through enrollment in a Medi-Cal managed care health plan pursuant to Section 1396u-2(b)(2)(D) of Title 42 of the United States Code shall be the resulting fee-for-service payment schedule amounts after the application of this section.

(2) This subdivision shall not apply to an eligible provider, as defined in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 14105.945, who provides noncontract emergency medical transports to an enrollee of a Medi-Cal managed care plan during any Medi-Cal managed care rating period that Section 14105.945 is implemented.

(c) The increased payments required by this section shall be funded solely from the following:

(1) The quality assurance fee set forth in Section 14129.2, along with any interest or other investment income earned on those funds.

(2) Federal reimbursement and any other related federal funds.

(d) The proceeds of the quality assurance fee set forth in Section 14129.2, the matching amount provided by the federal government, and any interest earned on those proceeds shall be used to supplement existing funding for emergency medical transports provided by emergency medical transport providers and not to supplant this funding.

(e) Notwithstanding this article, the department may seek federal approval to implement any add-on increase to the fee-for-service payment schedule pursuant to this section for any state fiscal year or years, as applicable, on a time-limited basis for a fixed program
 period, as determined by the department.

(f) Notwithstanding this article, the add-on increase to the fee-for-service payment schedule pursuant to this section shall only be required and payable for state fiscal years that a quality assurance fee payment obligation exists for emergency medical transport providers.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 544, Sec. 4.   (AB 1705)   Effective January 1, 2020.   Conditionally inoperative as prescribed in Section 14129.7.   Repealed conditionally as provided in Section 14129.7.)
-------------------------------------------

14129.4.

If there is a delay in the implementation of this article for any reason, including a delay in any required approval of the quality assurance fee and reimbursement methodology specified by the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services, both of the following shall apply:

(a) An emergency medical transport provider subject to the fee may be assessed the amount the provider would be required to pay to the department if the add-on increase to the fee-for-service payment schedule described in Section 14129.3 were already approved, but shall not be required to pay the fee until the add-on increase to the fee-for-service payment schedule described in Section 14129.3 is approved. The director shall establish a schedule for payment of retroactive fees pursuant to
 this subdivision in consultation with emergency medical transport providers to minimize the disruption to the cashflow of emergency medical transport providers.

(b) The department may retroactively implement the add-on increase to the fee-for-service payment schedule pursuant to Section 14129.3 to the extent the department determines that federal financial participation is available and is not otherwise jeopardized.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 773, Sec. 2.   (SB 523)   Effective October 13, 2017.   Conditionally inoperative as prescribed in Section 14129.7.   Repealed conditionally as provided in Section 14129.7.)
-------------------------------------------

14129.5.

Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department may implement, interpret, or make specific this article, in whole or in part, by means of provider bulletins, plan letters, or other similar instructions, without taking regulatory action. The department shall provide notification to the fiscal and appropriate policy committees of the Legislature within 10 business days after the above-described action is taken. The department shall make use of appropriate processes to ensure that affected stakeholders are timely informed of, and have access to, applicable guidance issued pursuant to this authority, and that this guidance remains publicly available so long as this article remains operative.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 773, Sec. 2.   (SB 523)   Effective October 13, 2017.   Conditionally inoperative as prescribed in Section 14129.7.   Repealed conditionally as provided in Section 14129.7.)
-------------------------------------------

14129.6.

(a) (1) The department shall request any approval from the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services it deems necessary for the use of fees pursuant to this article and for the purpose of receiving associated federal matching funds.

(2) In making that request, the department may seek, as it deems necessary, a request for waiver of the broad-based requirement, waiver of the uniformity requirement, or both, pursuant to paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (e) of Section 433.68 of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations, or a request for waiver of any other provisions of federal law or regulation necessary to implement this article.

(3) This
 article shall be implemented only to the extent that any necessary federal approvals are obtained and federal financial participation is available and is not otherwise jeopardized.

(b) The director may modify or make adjustments to any methodology, fee amount, or other provision specified in this article to the extent necessary to meet the requirements of federal law or regulations or to obtain federal approval. If the director, after consulting with affected emergency medical transport providers, determines that a modification is needed, the director shall execute a declaration stating that this determination has been made and that the actual or projected available fee amount for a state fiscal year remains approximately equal to the actual or projected aggregate fee schedule amount for each applicable state fiscal year, as defined by paragraph (4) of subdivision (b) of Section 14129.2. The director shall retain the declaration and provide a
 copy, within five working days of the execution of the declaration, to the fiscal and appropriate policy committees of the Legislature.

(c) The director may add categories of exempt emergency medical transport providers or apply a nonuniform fee per transport to emergency medical transport providers that are subject to the fee in order to meet requirements of federal law or regulations. The director may exempt categories of emergency medical transport providers from the fee if necessary to obtain federal approval.

(d) If, before June 1 preceding the start of an applicable state fiscal year, the director finds that the implementation of this article is likely no longer a benefit to the General Fund for the applicable state fiscal year, the director may decide to not implement this article for that state fiscal year. The director shall notify the appropriate fiscal and policy
 committees of the Legislature, and emergency medical transport providers individually and via the department’s Internet Web site of its finding pursuant to this subdivision.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 773, Sec. 2.   (SB 523)   Effective October 13, 2017.   Conditionally inoperative as prescribed in Section 14129.7.   Repealed conditionally as provided in Section 14129.7.)
-------------------------------------------

14129.7.

(a) This article shall be implemented only if, as long as, and to the extent that, all of the following conditions are met:

(1) The federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services does not determine that the quality assurance fee revenues may not be used for the purposes set forth in this article.

(2) The department obtains any necessary federal approvals for the collection of the quality assurance fee pursuant to this article and the add-on increase to the fee-for-service payment schedule described in subdivision (a) of Section 14129.3.

(3) The state continues its maintenance of effort for the level of state
 funding not derived from the quality assurance fee of emergency medical transports reimbursement for the 2018–19 rate year, and for each applicable rate year thereafter, in an amount not less than the amount that the state would have paid for the same number of emergency medical transports under the rate methodology that was in effect on July 31, 2016.

(4) Federal financial participation is available, and is not otherwise jeopardized.

(b) This article shall cease to be operative on the first day of the state fiscal year beginning on or after the date one or more of the following conditions is satisfied:

(1) The federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services no longer allows the collection or use of the emergency medical transport provider assessment provided in this article.

(2) The increase to the Medi-Cal payments described in Section 14129.3 no longer remains in effect.

(3) The quality assurance fee assessed and collected pursuant to this article is no longer available for the purposes specified in this article.

(4) The director determines that a change in federal law or federal Medicaid policy results or is likely to result in a reduction of associated federal financial participation for the Medi-Cal program such that the director determines the continued implementation of this article is no longer a benefit to the General Fund.

(5) A final judicial determination is made by the California Supreme Court or any California Court of Appeal that the revenues collected pursuant to this article that are deposited in the Medi-Cal
 Emergency Medical Transport Fund are either of the following:

(A) “General Fund proceeds of taxes appropriated pursuant to Article XIII B,” as used in subdivision (b) of Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution.

(B) “Allocated local proceeds of taxes,” as used in subdivision (b) of Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution.

(6) A final judicial determination made by any state or federal court that is not appealed, or by a court of appellate jurisdiction that is not further appealed, in any action by any party, or a final determination by the administrator of the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services that is not appealed, that federal financial participation is not available with respect to any payment made under the methodology implemented pursuant to this article.

(7) The state does not continue its maintenance of effort for the level of state funding of emergency medical transports reimbursement for the 2018–19 state fiscal year, or for any subsequent state fiscal year, in an amount not less than the amount that the state would have paid for the same number of emergency medical transports under the rate methodology in effect on July 31, 2016.

(c) In the event one or more of the conditions listed in subdivision (b) is satisfied, the director shall notify, in writing and as soon as practicable, the Secretary of State, the Secretary of the Senate, the Chief Clerk of the Assembly, the Legislative Counsel, and the fiscal and appropriate policy committees of the Legislature of the condition and the approximate date or dates that it occurred. The director shall post the notice on the department’s Internet Web site.

(d) (1) Notwithstanding any other law, in the event this article becomes inoperative pursuant to subdivision (b), the department shall be authorized to conduct all appropriate close-out activities and implement applicable provisions of this article for prior state fiscal years during which this article was operative including, but not limited to, the collection of outstanding quality assurance fees pursuant to Section 14129.2 and payments associated with any add-on increase to the Medi-Cal fee-for-service payment schedule pursuant to Section 14129.3. In implementing these close-out activities, the department shall ensure that the actual or projected available fee amount for each applicable state fiscal year remains approximately equal to the aggregate fee schedule amount for the state fiscal year, as defined by paragraph (4) of subdivision (b) of Section 14129.2. During this close-out period, the full amount of the quality
 assurance fee assessed and collected remains available only for the purposes specified in this article.

(2) Upon a determination by the department that all appropriate close-out and implementation activities pursuant to paragraph (1) have been completed, the director shall notify, in writing, the Secretary of State, the Secretary of the Senate, the Chief Clerk of the Assembly, the Legislative Counsel, and the fiscal and appropriate policy committees of the Legislature of that determination. This article shall be repealed as of the effective date of the notification issued by the director pursuant to this paragraph.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 773, Sec. 2.   (SB 523)   Effective October 13, 2017.   Repealed conditionally by its own provisions.   Note: Repeal affects Article 3.91, commencing with Section 14129.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. The Medi-Cal Benefits Program [14131. - 14138.]

14131.

The Medi-Cal Benefits Program comprises a department-administered uniform schedule of health care benefits. Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, “health care services” shall be limited to the benefits set forth in this article and in Section 14021.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1005.)
-------------------------------------------

14131.05.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter or Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 14200), optional hearing aid benefits are subject to per beneficiary benefit cap amounts under the Medi-Cal program.

(b) For the purposes of this section, “benefit cap amount” means the maximum amount of Medi-Cal coverage for optional hearing aid benefits as specified in subdivision (c), for each beneficiary, for each fiscal year.

(c) (1) If the voters approve the addition of Chapter 7.5 (commencing with Section 14199.100) to this part at the November 5, 2024, statewide general election, hearing aid benefits are subject to a benefit cap amount of one thousand five hundred ten dollars
 ($1,510).

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), if the voters do not approve the addition of Chapter 7.5 (commencing with Section 14199.100) to this part at the November 5, 2024, statewide general election, hearing aid benefits are subject to a benefit cap amount of no less than one thousand five hundred ten dollars ($1,510). Under that circumstance, the benefit cap amount shall be set by the department and may be adjusted annually, any revisions to the benefit cap shall be subject to the provisions of Sections 14124.162 and 14124.163.

(d) Pregnancy-related benefits and benefits for the treatment of other conditions that might complicate the pregnancy are not subject to the benefit cap amount in subdivision (c).

(e) The benefit cap amount in subdivision (c) does not apply to the following:

(1) Beneficiaries under the Early and Periodic Screening, Diagnosis, and Treatment Program.

(2) Beneficiaries receiving long-term care in a nursing facility that is both of the following:

(A) A skilled nursing facility or intermediate care facility as defined in subdivisions (c), (d), (e), (g), and (h), respectively, of Section 1250 of the Health and Safety Code, and facilities providing continuous skilled nursing care to developmentally disabled individuals pursuant to the program established by Section 14132.20.

(B) A licensed nursing facility pursuant to subdivision (k) of Section 1250 of the Health and Safety Code.

(f) For managed care health plans that contract with the department
 pursuant to this chapter or Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 14200), except for contracts with the Senior Care Action Network and AIDS Healthcare Foundation, payments for optional hearing aid benefits shall be reduced by the actuarial equivalent amount of the benefit reductions resulting from the implementation of the benefit cap amount specified in this section pursuant to contract amendments or change orders effective on July 1, 2011, or any date thereafter.

(g) This section shall be implemented only to the extent permitted by federal law.

(h) Notwithstanding the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), the department may implement the provisions of this section by means of all-county letters, provider bulletins, or similar instructions, without taking
 further regulatory action.

(i) This section shall be implemented on the first day of the first calendar month following 210 days after the effective date of this section, or on the first day of the first calendar month following 60 days after the date the department secures all necessary federal approvals to implement this section, whichever is later. If the implementation date occurs after July 1, 2011, then the benefit cap described in subdivision (c) for the first year of implementation shall be applied from the implementation date through June 30 of the state fiscal year in which implementation commences. Thereafter, the benefit cap shall apply on a state fiscal year basis.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 40, Sec. 64.   (SB 159)   Effective June 29, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

14131.10.

(a) Notwithstanding this chapter, Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 14200), or Chapter 8.75 (commencing with Section 14591), in order to implement changes in the level of funding for health care services, specific optional benefits are excluded from coverage under the Medi-Cal program.

(b) (1) The following optional benefits are excluded from coverage under the Medi-Cal program:

(A) Adult dental services, except as specified in paragraph (2).

(i) This exclusion shall be in effect only through December 31, 2017, and adult dental services shall
 be covered under the Medi-Cal program as of January 1, 2018, or the effective date of any necessary federal approvals, whichever is later.

(ii) The restoration of adult dental services pursuant to clause (i) shall be effective only to the extent any necessary federal approvals are obtained as required by subdivision (f).

(B) Audiology services and speech therapy services.

(C) Chiropractic services.

(D) Optometric and optician services, including services provided by a fabricating optical laboratory, except as provided in subdivision (g).

(E) Podiatric services.

(F) Incontinence creams and washes.

(2) (A) Medical and surgical services provided by a doctor of dental medicine or dental surgery, which, if provided by a physician, would be considered physician services, and which services may be provided by either a physician or a dentist in this state, are covered.

(B) Emergency procedures are also covered in the categories of service specified in subparagraph (A). The director may adopt regulations for any of the services specified in subparagraph (A).

(C) Effective May 1, 2014, or the effective date of any necessary federal approvals as required by subdivision (f), whichever is later, for persons 21
 years of age or older, adult dental benefits, subject to utilization controls, are limited to all the following medically necessary services:

(i) Examinations, radiographs/photographic images, prophylaxis, and fluoride treatments.

(ii) Amalgam and composite restorations.

(iii) Stainless steel, resin, and resin window crowns.

(iv) Anterior root canal therapy.

(v) Complete dentures, including immediate dentures.

(vi) Complete denture adjustments, repairs, and relines.

(D) Services
 specified in this paragraph shall be included as a covered medical benefit under the Medi-Cal program pursuant to Section 14132.89.

(3) Pregnancy-related services and services for the treatment of other conditions that might complicate the pregnancy are not excluded from coverage under this section.

(c) The optional benefit exclusions do not apply to either of the following:

(1) Beneficiaries under the Early and Periodic Screening, Diagnostic, and Treatment Program.

(2) Beneficiaries receiving long-term care in a nursing facility that is both:

(A) A skilled nursing facility or
 intermediate care facility as defined in subdivisions (c) and (d) of Section 1250 of the Health and Safety Code.

(B) Licensed pursuant to subdivision (k) of Section 1250 of the Health and Safety Code.

(d) This section shall only be implemented to the extent permitted by federal law.

(e) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department may implement the provisions of this section by means of all-county letters, provider bulletins, or similar instructions, without taking further regulatory action.

(f) This section shall be implemented only to the extent that federal financial
 participation is available and any necessary federal approvals have been obtained.

(g) (1) Effective no sooner than January 1, 2020, or January 1 of the subsequent calendar year following the legislative action pursuant to paragraph (2), whichever is later, and subject to paragraph (2) and subdivision (f), optometric and optician services, including services provided by a fabricating optical laboratory, shall be covered benefits under the Medi-Cal program.

(2) The restoration of optometric and optician services pursuant to this subdivision is contingent upon the Legislature including funding for these services in the state budget process.

(h) Effective no sooner than January 1, 2020, all of the following optional
 benefits shall be covered benefits under the Medi-Cal program:

(1) Audiology services and speech therapy services.

(2) Podiatric services.

(3) Incontinence creams and washes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 143, Sec. 386.   (AB 133)   Effective July 27, 2021.   Operative July 1, 2016, by Stats. 2016, Ch. 30, Sec. 36.)
-------------------------------------------

14131.11.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter or Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 14200), any increase in the amount charged to the Medi-Cal program for patient care or treatment that is directly related to an identifiable provider-preventable condition is excluded from reimbursement under Medi-Cal, in accordance with criteria set forth in federal and state law and the state’s Medi-Cal State Plan, except when the provider-preventable condition existed prior to the initiation of treatment for that patient by that provider.

(b) The exclusion from reimbursement specified in subdivision (a) applies to the amounts charged for the care and treatment of individuals eligible under the Medi-Cal
 program, both in fee-for-service and managed care delivery systems, including individuals dually eligible for both the Medicare and Medi-Cal programs, individuals eligible under the California Children’s Services Program, and individuals eligible under the Genetically Handicapped Persons Program.

(c) Exclusion from reimbursement under Medi-Cal pursuant to this section for increased amounts charged to Medi-Cal related to a provider-preventable condition shall be limited to the extent the identified provider-preventable condition would otherwise result in an increase in payment and the state can reasonably isolate for nonpayment the portion of the payment directly related to treatment for, and related to, the provider-preventable condition.

(d) For health care-acquired conditions, the department may limit application of the exclusion from reimbursement as appropriate for specific
 populations, including, but not limited to, the pediatric population, after consultation with the federal government and stakeholders.

(e) For health care-acquired conditions, the exclusion of reimbursement is initially limited to only those services provided by inpatient hospitals. For other provider-preventable conditions, the exclusion from reimbursement applies to health care services provided by any provider. This subdivision shall not limit the department from excluding from reimbursement those services provided in additional care settings as determined by the department. The department shall notify and consult with appropriate stakeholders prior to implementing, interpreting, or making specific this subdivision.

(f) Medi-Cal providers, in both fee-for-service and managed care delivery systems, shall report the occurrence of any provider-preventable condition in any
 individual identified in subdivision (b) that did not exist prior to initiation of treatment by that provider. The report shall be made to the department as specified by the department, regardless of whether or not the provider seeks Medi-Cal reimbursement for services to treat the provider-preventable condition.

(g) If a provider in either a fee-for-service or managed care delivery system receives a Medi-Cal payment or reimbursement for any increase in costs for patient care or treatment directly related to an identifiable provider-preventable condition that was not present when the individual initiated treatment with that provider, the provider shall reimburse those costs to the department or plan.

(h) For purposes of this section, “provider-preventable condition,” “health care-acquired condition,” and “other provider-preventable condition” are defined as set forth in Section
 447.26(b) of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(i) A provider is prohibited from pursuing payment or reimbursement from a beneficiary for any increased amounts directly related to treatment for, and related to, the provider-preventable condition.

(j) (1) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department may implement, interpret, or make specific this section by means of plan letters, plan or provider bulletins, or similar instructions, without taking regulatory action, until the time regulations are adopted. Prior to issuing any letter, bulletin, or similar instruction authorized pursuant to this section, the department shall notify and consult with stakeholders, including advocates, providers, and beneficiaries. The department shall notify the appropriate policy
 and fiscal committees of the Legislature of its intent to issue instructions under this section at least five days in advance of the issuance. It is the intent of the Legislature that the department be provided temporary authority as necessary to implement program changes until completion of the regulatory process, which shall further address and take into account the input of stakeholders.

(2) The department shall adopt emergency regulations pursuant to Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code no later than January 1, 2017. The department may readopt any emergency regulation authorized by this section that is the same as or substantially equivalent to an emergency regulation previously adopted under this section. The initial adoption of emergency regulations and one readoption of emergency regulations implementing this section shall be deemed an emergency and necessary for the
 immediate preservation of the public peace, health, safety, or general welfare.

(3) Initial emergency regulations and the one readoption of emergency regulations authorized by this section shall be exempt from review by the Office of Administrative Law. The initial emergency regulations and the one readoption of emergency regulations shall be submitted to the Office of Administrative Law for filing with the Secretary of State and each shall remain in effect for no more than 180 days, by which time final regulations may be adopted.

(k) The department shall seek any necessary federal approvals for the implementation of this section.

(l) This section shall be implemented only to the extent that federal financial participation is not jeopardized.

(m) This
 section shall be implemented in accordance with the methodology set forth in the state plan in effect on July 1, 2012, and subsequently in accordance with any future methodologies approved by the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 31, Sec. 50.   (SB 857)   Effective June 20, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

14131.15.

(a) In geographic areas in which Medi-Cal managed care plans contracting under this chapter or Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 14200) are operating with capacity to enroll additional qualifying Medi-Cal beneficiaries, the director may, in the interest of bringing managed care principles to bear on the quality, costs, or utilization levels of the Medi-Cal program, designate any benefit or service included in the Medi-Cal program, at state option under federal medicaid rules, as a covered Medi-Cal benefit only when provided by a Medi-Cal
 managed care plan to a Medi-Cal enrollee of the plan.

(b) Where benefits and services have been designated by the director under subdivision (a), beneficiaries who are eligible to enroll in and reside in the service area of a managed care plan, and who desire coverage for such benefits and services, must enroll in a Medi-Cal managed care plan to receive them and shall, to the maximum extent permitted under federal law, remain enrolled in the plan.
